Washington statutes.
RCW 18.83.090

Continuing education requirements—Human trafficking information—License renewal.

(1) The board shall establish rules governing mandatory continuing education requirements which shall be met by any psychologist applying for a license renewal.

(2) The office of crime victims advocacy shall supply the board with information on methods of recognizing victims of human trafficking, what services are available for these victims, and where to report potential trafficking situations. The information supplied must be culturally sensitive and must include information relating to minor victims. The board shall disseminate this information to licensees by: Providing the information on the board's website; including the information in newsletters; holding trainings at meetings attended by organization members; or through another distribution method determined by the board. The board shall report to the office of crime victims advocacy on the method or methods it uses to distribute information under this subsection.

(3) Administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees for renewal and reissue of licenses shall be established as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 2009 c 492 s 6; 1996 c 191 s 68; 1991 c 3 s 200; 1984 c 279 s 83; 1977 c 58 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 74; 1971 ex.s. c 266 s 16; 1965 c 70 s 9; 1955 c 305 s 9.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 279: See RCW 18.130.901.